Utah statutes.
53A-1-1107.   Calculation of points earned for students' learning gains in language arts, mathematics, and science.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a school shall receive points, as determined by the State Board of Education, for students who take a statewide assessment of language arts, mathematics, or science achievement in two successive years and:

(a)  maintain a proficient level or higher from one school year to the next; or

(b)  improve their achievement level from one school year to the next.

(2)  Points assigned for students who score below the proficient level in the prior school year and improve their achievement level or score at the proficient level or higher in the current year shall be double the number of points assigned for students who maintain a proficient level from one school year to the next.

(3)  A school may earn a maximum of 350 points for the criteria described in Subsection (1).

